Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.740

Execution of agreement.

(1) A supported decision-making agreement must be in writing, dated, and signed voluntarily, without coercion or undue influence, by the adult with a disability and the supporter in the presence of two or more subscribing witnesses or a notary public.

(2) If signed before two witnesses, the attesting witnesses must be at least eighteen years of age.

(3) The witnesses required by subsection (1) of this section may not be any of the following:

(a) A supporter for the person with a disability;

(b) An employee or agent of a supporter named in the supported decision-making agreement;

(c) A paid provider of services to the person with a disability; or

(d) Any person who does not understand the type of communication the person with a disability uses, unless an individual who understands the person with a disability's means of communication is present to assist during the execution of the supported decision-making agreement.

[ 2020 c 312 s 609.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.